en: Tomato purées, Tomato purees, Pureed tomato
bg: Доматено пюре
da: Tomatpuréer
de: Tomatenpüree, pürierte Tomaten
es: Tomate natural triturado
fi: Tomaattisoseet, tomaattipyreet
fr: Purées de tomates, purées de tomate, purée de tomates, purée de tomate
hr: Pire od rajčice
it: Puree di pomodoro
lt: Pomidorų tyrės, Pomidorų tyrė
nl: Tomatenpurees
pt: Purés de tomate

en: Canned tomato purées, Canned tomato puree
da: Tomatpuréer på dåse
fr: Purée de tomates ap0pertisée, Purée de tomates en conserve
hr: Pire od rajčice iz konzerve
lt: Konservuota pomidorų tyrė

en: Tomato caviar, Seasonned tomato puree
fr: Caviars de tomates, Caviar de tomates

en: Tomato pastes, Canned concentrated tomato paste
bg: Доматена паста
da: Tomatkoncentrater, Tomatpastaer
de: Tomatenmark
es: Pastas de tomate
fi: tomaattitahnat
fr: Concentrés de tomates, concentrés de tomate, concentré de tomates, concentré de tomate, Concentré de tomate appertisé
hr: Paste od rajčice
it: Concentrati di pomodoro
ja: トマトペースト
lt: Pomidorų pasta, Konservuota koncentruota pomidorų pasta
nl: Tomatenpastas
pl: Koncentrat pomidorowy
sv: Tomatpuréer

en: Double concentrate tomato paste, Tomato paste double concentrated
bg: Двойно концентриана доматена паста
da: Dobbeltkoncentreret tomatkoncentrat, Dobbeltkoncentreret tomatpasta
de: Tomatenmark zweifach konzentriert
fr: Double concentré de tomate
hr: Dvostruki koncentrat paste od rajčice
sv: Dubbelkoncentrerade tomatpuréer, Dubbelt koncentrerade tomatpuréer, Tomatpuréer dubbel koncentrerade

en: Tomato pulps
da: Hakkede tomater
es: Pulpa de tomate
fr: Pulpes de tomates, pulpes de tomate, pulpe de tomates, pulpe de tomate
hr: Pulpe rajčice
it: Polpe di pomodoro, polpa di pomodoro, polpe di pomodori, polpa di pomodori
lt: Pomidorų minkštimas
nb: Hakkede tomater
nl: Tomatenpulp
pt: Polpas de tomate
sv: Krossade tomater

en: Fine tomato pulps
da: Finthakkede tomater
fi: Hieno tomaattimurska
it: Polpa fine di pomodoro
nb: Finhakkede tomater
sv: Finkrossade tomater

en: Boiled tomato pulp and peel, Tomato pulp and peel cooked in water
fr: Pulpe et peau de tomate bouillie, Pulpe et peau de tomate cuite à l'eau

en: Roasted tomato with skin, Baked tomato with skin
fr: Pulpe et peau de tomate rôtie, Pulpe et peau de tomate cuite au four

en: Tzatzikis
bg: Дзадзики
de: Tsatsikis, Zazikis, Tsatsiki, Zaziki
fi: Tsatsikit
fr: Tzatzíki
hr: Tzatzikis
it: Tzatzikis
ja: ザジキ
nl: Tzatzikis
pl: Tzatziki

en: Vegetable sauces
de: Gemüsesaucen
es: Salsas con verduras, Salsas con vegetales
fi: kasviskastikkeet
fr: Sauces aux légumes
he: רטבים צמחיים, רטבים צמחוניים, רטבי ירקות
hr: Umaci od povrća
it: Salse a base di vegetali
lt: Daržovių padažai
nl: Groentesauzen
pl: Sosy warzywne

en: Olive sauces
de: Olivensaucen
es: Salsas con aceitunas, Salsas con olivas
fr: Sauces aux olives
he: ממרחי זיתים, ממרח זית
hr: Umaci od maslina
lt: Alyvuogių padažai
nl: Sauzen met olijven

en: Meals, Prepared meals, Prepared dishes
bg: Готови ястия
ca: Menjar preparat
da: Måltider, Tilberedte måltider, Tilberedte retter, Færdigretter
de: Fertiggerichte
es: Comidas preparadas, Platos preparados
fi: valmiit ateriat
fr: Plats préparés, plat préparé, plats cuisinés, plat cuisiné
he: מנות, ארוחות, אוכל מוכן
hr: pripremljena jela
hu: Ételek, Kész ételek, Elkészített ételek
it: Pasti
lt: Patiekalai, Paruošti patiekalai
nl: Kant-en-klaar maaltijden
no: Måltider, Tilberedte måltider, Tilberedte retter, Ferdigmat
pl: Posiłki, Gotowe posiłki, Dania gotowe
pt: Refeições, Refeições preparadas, Pratos preparados
ru: Блюда готовые к употреблению
sv: Färdigmat, Färdigrätter, Färdigrätt.
th: อาหารพร้อมกิน
tr: Hazır yemek
zh: 菜肴

en: Dough based meals variety packs
de: Teigbasierte Gerichtemischpackungen
es: Paquetes surtidos de productos y comidas a base de masa
fr: Produits à base de pâte
hr: Različita pakiranja jela na bazi tijesta
it: Confezioni miste di piatti a base di pasta
nl: Assortimenten van maaltijden op basis van deeg
pt: Packs variados de produtos y refeições à base de massa culinária

en: Pad thai
xx: Pad Thaï, Pad Thai
ja: パッタイ

en: Bami goreng
xx: Bami goreng

en: Nasi goreng
xx: Nasi goreng

en: Meal replacements, meal substitutes
de: Ersatzmahlzeiten
fi: aterian korvikkeet
fr: Substituts de repas
hr: Zamjene za obroke
it: Sostituto del pasto
lt: Maisto pakaitalai, maisto pakaitalas
nl: Maaltijdvervangers
pl: Substytuty mięsa, Zamienniki mięsa

en: Low calorie meal replacement
fr: Substitut de repas hypocalorique
hr: Niskokalorična zamjena za obrok
lt: Mažai kaloringi maisto pakaitalai

en: Low calorie custard cream meal replacement
fr: Substitut de repas hypocalorique crème dessert